Hawaii statutes.
§708-895.7 Unauthorized computer access in
the third degree. (1) A person commits the offense of unauthorized
computer access in the third degree if the person knowingly accesses a
computer, computer system, or computer network without authorization.

(2) Unauthorized computer access in the third
degree is a class C felony. [L 2001, c 33, pt of §1; am L 2012, c 293, §6]

COMMENTARY ON §§708-890 TO 708-895.7

Act 225, Session Laws 1992, repealed former §§708-890 to 708-896
and added this part [§§708-890 to 708-893] to expand the degree of protection
afforded to individuals and organizations from persons who tamper, interfere,
damage, and gain unauthorized access to their computers, computer systems,
software, and data. Finding that the growth in computer use has resulted in a
similar growth in unauthorized access to computer systems, the legislature
created two new offenses of "computer fraud" and "unauthorized
computer use," both class C felonies. The legislature, however,
recognized that other people, including harmless pranksters, students, or
curious computer hackers, may gain unauthorized access to computer systems and
do no damage to those systems. Although these people have committed a serious
breach of privacy, they do not deserve to be charged with a class C felony; the
legislature therefore created the affirmative defense of "entry without
disruption," authorizing a court to dismiss a prosecution if, having
regard for the nature of the alleged conduct and attendant circumstances, it
finds that the defendant's conduct did not actually cause harm or damage to a
computer system or network. The court must also file a written statement of
its reasons for dismissal. Conference Committee Report No. 29.

Act 33, Session Laws 2001, strengthened the State's computer
crime laws, by, among other things, replacing statutes relating to computer
crimes with several new offenses and provisions to deter computer fraud,
damage, and other computer-related perpetrations, allowing the forfeiture of
property used in computer crimes, and updating computer-related definitions to
reflect modern technology and for clarity. The legislature found that society
was adopting at a rapid pace, computer technology to conduct activities of
daily living. Computer technology was being utilized not only for purposes of
business and recreation, but also for criminal activity. Thus,
computer-related criminal activity was on the rise as society's dependence on
computers increased. Senate Standing Committee Report No. 1508.

Act 3, Session Laws 2003, made a technical amendment to
§708-890, by deleting the brackets around the word "retrieve" in the
definition of "access."

Act 141, Session Laws 2006, amended §708-893 to include the
use of a computer to obtain control over the property of the victim [to commit
theft in the first or second degree]. The legislature found that the use of a
computer to commit theft is a growing problem in Hawaii and the number of
crimes perpetrated via the Internet is increasing. Using a computer as an
instrument of the crime offers the perpetrator relative anonymity, a quick and
easy mechanism to commit fraud, and the potential for sizable financial gain. Hawaii's statutes relating to computer fraud are inadequate for purposes of prosecuting
internet fraud. The amendment of §708-893 would enable law enforcement to
respond more efficiently to the various forms of computer crime. Senate
Standing Committee Report Nos. 3116 and 3306.

Act 192, Session Laws 2012, amended §708-893(1) by: (1)
establishing that knowingly using a computer to perform certain acts against a
victim or intended victim of harassment under §711-1106, or harassment by
stalking under §711-1106.5, constitutes the offense of use of a computer in the
commission of a separate crime; and (2) clarifying that the offense of use of a
computer in the commission of a separate crime also includes knowingly using a
computer to pursue, surveil, contact, harass, annoy, or alarm a victim or
intended victim. The legislature found that Act 192 would assist in combating
cyberbullying and preventing the emotional harm caused by the dissemination of
personal information of an individual, whether true or false, via the Internet
or wireless cellular communications. Senate Standing Committee Report No. 3232.

Act 293, Session Laws 2012, amended §708-891 to update
Hawaii's computer crime statutes by adding language mirroring Hawaii's identity
theft statutes to better address the realities of modern cybercrime by changing
the offense of computer fraud in the first degree from a class B felony to a
class A felony. Act 293 was intended to streamline and update computer crime
statutes to better address and combat cybercrime. Senate Standing Committee
Report No. 3230, Conference Committee Report No. 36-12.

Act 293, Session Laws 2012, amended §708-891.5 to update
Hawaii's computer crime statutes by adding language mirroring Hawaii's identity
theft statutes to better address the realities of modern cybercrime by changing
the offense of computer fraud in the second degree from a class C felony to a
class B felony. Act 293 was intended to streamline and update computer crime
statutes to better address and combat cybercrime. Senate Standing Committee
Report No. 3230, Conference Committee Report No. 36-12.

Act 293, Session Laws 2012, added §708-891.6 to establish a
new offense of computer fraud in the third degree as a class C felony to update
Hawaii's computer crime statutes, adding language mirroring Hawaii's identity
theft statutes to better address the realities of modern cybercrime. Act 293
was intended to streamline and update computer crime statutes to better address
and combat cybercrime. Senate Standing Committee Report No. 3230, Conference
Committee Report No. 36-12.

Act 293, Session Laws 2012, amended §708-895.5 to update
Hawaii's computer crime statutes by adding language mirroring Hawaii's identity
theft statutes to better address the realities of modern cybercrime by: (1)
changing the offense of unauthorized computer access in the first degree from a
class B felony to a class A felony; and (2) increasing the minimum value of
information obtained that constitutes unauthorized computer access in the first
degree from $5,000 to $20,000. Act 293 was intended to streamline and update
computer crime statutes to better address and combat cybercrime. Senate
Standing Committee Report No. 3230, Conference Committee Report No. 36-12.

Act 293, Session Laws 2012, amended §708-895.6 to update
Hawaii's computer crime statutes by adding language mirroring Hawaii's identity
theft statutes to better address the realities of modern cybercrime by changing
the offense of unauthorized computer access in the second degree from a class C
to a class B felony. Act 293 was intended to streamline and update computer crime
statutes to better address and combat cybercrime. Senate Standing Committee
Report No. 3230, Conference Committee Report No. 36-12.

Act 293, Session Laws 2012, amended §708-895.7 to update
Hawaii's computer crime statutes by adding language mirroring Hawaii's identity
theft statutes to better address the realities of modern cybercrime by changing
the offense of unauthorized computer access in the third degree from a
misdemeanor to a class C felony. Act 293 was intended to streamline and update
computer crime statutes to better address and combat cybercrime. Senate
Standing Committee Report No. 3230, Conference Committee Report No. 36-12.

Act 213, Session Laws 2014, (1) created and established as a
class C felony the offense of computer damage in the third degree
[(§708-892.6)] as knowingly accessing a computer, computer system, or computer
network without authorization and recklessly causing damage; (2) redefined and
increased to a class A felony the offense of computer damage in the first
degree [(§708-892)] as intentionally causing or attempting to cause damage to a
computer, computer system, or computer network that manages or controls any
critical infrastructure and specified that the offense applies to damage to
state and federal critical infrastructure; (3) redefined and increased to a
class B felony the offense of computer damage in the second degree
[(§708-892.5)] as knowingly causing the transmission of a program, information,
code, or command, and thereby knowingly causing unauthorized damage to a
computer, computer system, or computer network, or intentionally accessing a
computer, computer system, or computer network without authorization, and
thereby knowingly causing damage; and (4) added a new definition of "critical
infrastructure" [(§708-890)]. The legislature found that existing law
only applied when a perpetrator used a computer to damage another computer,
such as by hacking or transmitting a computer virus. However, greater
protections were needed for [computers managing or controlling] critical
infrastructure, as damage to these computers jeopardized public health, safety,
and security, regardless of how the damage occurred. Senate Standing Committee
Report No. 2452, House Standing Committee Report No. 1100-14.

Act 231, Session Laws 2016, amended §708-893(1) by repealing
a provision that subjects a person to a separate charge and enhanced penalty
for using a computer to commit an underlying theft crime. The amendment
implemented the recommendation made by the Penal Code Review Committee convened
pursuant to House Concurrent Resolution No. 155, S.D. 1 (2015). The Penal Code
Review Committee commented, on page 51 of its report:

Currently, the enhanced penalties for
use of a computer in the commission of a separate crime converts first-degree
theft into a class A felony and second-degree theft into a class B felony. The
definition of "computer" for purposes of this section would appear to
include devices such as smartphones. Given the prevalence of such devices and
the widespread use of "computers" in today's society in general,
imposing the enhanced penalties for the use of a computer in committing theft
seems unduly harsh.

House Standing Committee Report No. 660-16.

Previous
Vol14_Ch0701-0853
Next